Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 16. Miscellaneous Provisions.
Sec. 38.05.860.
Deposits.

The commissioner may require an applicant seeking the sale, lease, or other disposal of land or an interest in land, other than under an oil and gas lease, gas only lease, or mineral lease, to deposit an amount covering the estimated cost of an appraisal, survey, and other costs necessary to offer the land or interest in land, including advertising. All deposited funds not expended shall be refunded to the applicant. If the land or interest in land is awarded to a person other than the applicant making the deposit, the person awarded the land shall pay the total actual cost incurred by the department in making the disposal, and the deposit shall be returned to the original applicant. In lieu of requiring the deposit under this subsection, the commissioner may enter into an agreement with an applicant seeking land or an interest in land requiring the applicant to reimburse the department for costs incurred in the disposal if the applicant is awarded the land or interest in land.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, if a competitive sale or lease of state land, minerals, timber, or materials is to be made by sealed bid, the director may require each bidder to submit an earnest money deposit with each bid. If the sale or lease is by public auction, the director may require each person desiring to bid to make an earnest money deposit before bidding. The earnest money deposit of the highest qualified bidder shall be applied toward the sale or lease price. If the successful bidder defaults in the payment of the amount bid, the deposit shall be forfeited to the state. All other earnest money deposits shall be returned unless the commissioner decides to award the contract to the second highest qualified bidder upon default by the highest bidder rather than call for new bids, in which case the commissioner may retain the deposit of the second highest qualified bidder until final disposition of the land is made. A successful bidder for a mineral lease who can prove to the satisfaction of the commissioner within 45 days after notification of the lease award that there is a reasonable doubt as to the ability of the state to grant a valid lease to the land may withdraw the amount bid and have the earnest money deposit returned.

The commissioner shall require each bidder for the competitive leasing of land for oil and gas, or for gas only, to submit with each bid a deposit of money equal to 20 percent of the bonus.

History.

(§ 8 art III ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 155 SLA 1978; am § 18 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am §§ 42, 43 ch 49 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.335

. Renumbered in 1984.

Administrative Code. —

For timber and material sale procedures, see 11 AAC 71, art. 1.

For competitive bidding, see 11 AAC 82, art. 4.

Sec. 38.05.870.
Grants of land after natural disaster.

The director may make grants of state land to persons and municipal corporations to replace land which is rendered unusable by a natural disaster for the purposes for which it was used before the natural disaster. The director shall designate state land which is available to replace land rendered unusable.

Only a person who is the owner of land rendered unusable that was used or leased before the natural disaster for private residential, business, or commercial purposes is eligible for a grant of state land. A person who incurred a binding obligation to purchase land before the natural disaster shall be considered the owner of the land for the purposes of this section.

An application for a grant of state land shall be filed with the director, and shall contain

the name and address of the applicant;

a legal description of the land rendered unusable;

proof of ownership of the land; and

a statement of the purpose for which the land was used before the natural disaster rendered it unusable.

The director shall, within 30 days of receipt of the application, approve or disapprove the application. The director’s determination of eligibility for a grant of state land is final. Upon approval of the application or as soon thereafter as possible, the director shall specify the land which shall be granted to an eligible applicant. In making the designation the director shall consider the value, size and use of the land rendered unusable as a result of the natural disaster, and shall as nearly as possible grant land of equal size, or value or of equal utility.

The applicant shall pay costs, not to exceed the administrative cost of transferring the property and the cost of surveying the land. In addition, the state may require a quitclaim deed to the unusable land in exchange for the grant of state land.

In this section “natural disaster” means a flood, drought, fire, storm, earthquake, or other catastrophe which, in the determination of the governor, is or threatens to be of sufficient severity to warrant state assistance to persons and municipal corporations to alleviate damage, suffering, and hardship caused by the catastrophe.

History.

(§ 1 ch 4 FSSLA 1967)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.348

. Renumbered in 1984.

Sec. 38.05.872.
Disposition of state land and resources for flood control projects.

The department may make conveyances of title or other interests in state land, provide for exchange of land, or make other arrangements with respect to state land, as necessary to meet federally established requirements of flood control projects authorized inside the state by the United States.

The commissioner may convey materials at less than fair market value to municipalities, other state and federal agencies, or other entities, and make other arrangements for land and materials as mitigation of a flooding area where excess material deposition significantly contributes to the flooding, consistent with a site-specific flood mitigation plan approved by the commissioner and determined to be in the best interests of the public.

History.

(§ 2 ch 129 SLA 1971; am § 21 ch 27 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.349

. Renumbered in 1984.

Sec. 38.05.874.
Public access fund created.

The public access fund is established as a special account in the general fund and funds may be deposited into the special account and withdrawn from it as provided in this section. The fund consists of money contributed to it by individuals and corporations and interest derived from those contributions. The fund shall be invested by the commissioner of revenue. The Department of Revenue may be reimbursed for actual administrative costs incurred under this subsection by appropriation from the public access fund.

Except as provided in (a) of this section, the commissioner shall administer the fund. The commissioner, after public hearings and in concurrence with the commissioner of fish and game, may use money in the fund to develop recreational access, including the purchase and lease of land, easements, and rights-of-way to enhance public access to recreational areas.

The title to rights of public access to recreational areas obtained by the commissioner vests in the state. The commissioner shall include in the instrument transferring title to the state a clause requiring that the land be used for public access. If the land ceases to be available for public access, the state shall either

pay to the fund the assessed value of the land at that time; or

if the land was purchased with funds derived under 16 U.S.C. 777 — 777k (Sport Fish Restoration Act), as amended, reimburse the sport fish restoration program.

The legislature may appropriate to the fund. The interest earned on funds appropriated to the public access fund by the legislature shall be deposited in the general fund. The commissioner of administration shall separately account for the interest deposited in the general fund under this subsection. The annual estimated balance in the account may be appropriated by the legislature to the public access fund.

History.

(§ 3 ch 53 SLA 1988)

Sec. 38.05.875.
Administration of land acquired under former AS 34.10.

The department may sell, lease, or administer all real property to which the state obtained title under former AS 34.10 in the same manner as it is authorized to sell, lease, or administer other state land. Proceeds derived from the sales, leases, or administration shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue and deposited into the general fund of the state.

History.

(§ 10 ch 134 SLA 1953; am § 6 ch 135 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

34.10.170

.
Renumbered in 1985.
When the section was renumbered, minor changes were made in the first sentence to reflect the 1978 repeal of the balance of
AS 34.10.

Sec. 38.05.880.
Departmental review.

The department is not required to determine whether an owner of a mining claim, leasehold location, or mining lease is in compliance with this chapter or the regulations adopted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 14 ch 31 SLA 2020)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as
AS 38.05.283 and renumbered in 2020.

Effective dates. —

Section 17, ch. 31, SLA 2020 makes this section effective April 30, 2020, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.